Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.020

Board of massage—Generally.

The Washington state board of massage is created. The board shall consist of seven members who shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four years each. All members shall be residents of this state. Five members shall be massage therapists licensed under this chapter with at least three years' experience in the practice of massage immediately preceding their appointment and shall at all times during their terms remain licensed massage therapists.

One member shall be a consumer whose occupation does not include the administration of health activities or the provision of health services and who has no material financial interest in the provision of health care services.

One member shall be a massage educator or massage school owner with at least three years' experience in the teaching or administration of direct student learning of the practice of massage. The educator or school owner member is not required to be a licensed massage therapist. The member shall recuse themselves from any board deliberations or decision making involving the school or educational program with which the member is professionally affiliated.

In the event that a member cannot complete their term of office, another appointment shall be made by the governor in accordance with the procedures stated in this section to fill the remainder of the term. No member may serve more than two successive full terms. The governor may remove any member of the board for neglect of duty, incompetence, or unprofessional or disorderly conduct as determined under chapter 18.130 RCW.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

The board may annually elect a chairperson to direct the meetings of the board. The board shall meet as called by the chairperson or the secretary. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

[ 2022 c 240 s 9; 1991 c 3 s 253; 1987 c 443 s 9. Prior: 1984 c 287 s 53; 1984 c 279 s 56; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 57; 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 2.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.